Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 4. Founders

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-401.
Reservation to founder of power to amend, revoke, restate or terminate.

Subject to subsections (b) and (c) of this section, a founder may reserve the following powers to himself, or a specific number of founders if applicable:

Pursuant to W.S.

17-30-201

, the power to amend or restate the articles of formation of a statutory foundation;

Pursuant to W.S.

17-30-201

, the power to amend the purposes of the statutory foundation;

The power to amend, revoke or restate the terms of the operating agreement of the statutory foundation;

The power to terminate the statutory foundation.

A founder must expressly reserve those powers specified in paragraphs (a)(i) and (ii) of this section in the articles of formation of the statutory foundation. The founder may expressly reserve those powers specified by paragraphs (a)(iii) and (iv) of this section in the articles of formation.

Unless the articles of formation or operating agreement of a statutory foundation provide otherwise, any powers reserved to a founder in subsection (a) of this section shall lapse on the death, dissolution or termination of the founder.

A founder shall expressly reserve those powers specified in paragraphs (a)(iii) and (iv) of this section in the operating agreement of the statutory foundation.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 98, § 1, effective April 5, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, in (a)(i), added "Pursuant to W.S.

17-30-201

," at the beginning and made a related change; and added (d).

Laws 2021, ch. 98, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 5, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-402.
Protection from founder’s successors.

The heirs, spouse or creditors of a founder shall not:

Amend or restate the articles of formation of a statutory foundation;

Amend the purpose of a statutory foundation, if any;

Terminate the statutory foundation.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.